Illinois, session 104th, HB1071.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Labor Dispute Act is amended by changing 5Section 1.1 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 5/1.1)  (from Ch. 48, par. 2a.1)7    Sec. 1.1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Labor Dispute Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-1324.)